Utah statutes.
53B-1-109.   Coordination of higher education and public education information technology systems -- Use of unique student identifier.

(1)  As used in this section, "unique student identifier" has the same meaning as provided in Section 53A-1-603.5.

(2)  The State Board of Regents and State Board of Education shall coordinate public education and higher education information technology systems to allow individual student academic achievement to be tracked through both education systems in accordance with this section and Section 53A-1-603.5.

(3)  Information technology systems utilized at an institution within the state system of higher education shall utilize the unique student identifier of all students who have previously been assigned a unique student identifier.

